Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 9

Consolidation of Railroads

65-9-101. Power to consolidate.

Every railroad corporation existing in this state, and having authority to operate and maintain a railroad in this state, has the power to consolidate with any other railroad corporation whose road connects with or intersects the road of such existing corporation, or any branch of such road.

Acts 1871, ch. 69, § 1; 1875, ch. 51, § 1; 1877, ch. 72, § 2; Shan., § 1522; Code 1932, § 2597; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-901.

Cross-References. Consolidation of competing or parallel lines unlawful, § 65-6-131.

65-9-102. Consolidation agreement.

The agreement of consolidation shall be in writing, and shall set forth the corporate name agreed upon, and the terms and conditions of the consolidation.

Acts 1871, ch. 69, § 1; 1877, ch. 72, § 2; Shan., § 1523; Code 1932, § 2598; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-902.

65-9-103. Approval of stockholders.

The consolidation shall not have effect until the terms and conditions of the agreement shall have been approved by a majority of the stockholders of each of the consolidating companies, at a regular annual meeting.

Acts 1867-1868, ch. 72, § 1; 1871, ch. 69, § 1; 1877, ch. 72, § 2; Shan., § 1524; mod. Code 1932, § 2599; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-903.

65-9-104. Agreement and evidence of approval recorded.

The agreement, together with the evidence of the stockholders' approval, shall be filed and recorded in the office of the secretary of state.

Acts 1871, ch. 69, § 1; 1877, ch. 72, § 2; Shan., § 1525; Code 1932, § 2600; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-904.

65-9-105. Rights of creditors.

The rights of creditors of the consolidating companies shall not be affected or impaired by such consolidation.

Acts 1871, ch. 69, § 1; 1877, ch. 12, § 4; 1877, ch. 72, § 2; Shan., § 1526; Code 1932, § 2601; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-905.

65-9-106. Rights and liabilities of consolidated corporation.

The corporation, formed by the consolidation of two (2) or more railroad corporations, shall have, possess, and exercise all the rights, powers, privileges, immunities, and franchises, and be subject to all the duties and obligations, not inconsistent with this chapter, conferred and imposed by the laws of this state upon such companies so consolidating, or either of them.

Acts 1877, ch. 72, § 3; Shan., § 1527; Code 1932, § 2602; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-906.

65-9-107. Powers of consolidated corporation.

The corporation shall have power to:

Fix the number of its directors and the time of their election;

Fix the number, names, and duties of its officers;

Pass bylaws for the government of the company, and the management of its affairs;

Create and divide its capital stock into two (2) or more classes, including common and preferred stock, any of which may be stock without par value and to issue the same, all as provided by title 48, chapter 16, pertaining to ordinary domestic corporations, which sections are declared to extend to corporations formed by the consolidation of two (2) or more railroad corporations; and any such corporation, heretofore so formed under the laws of this state, may avail itself of the powers and privileges hereby conferred by amendment or amendments to the charter of incorporation of such corporation, in the manner and by the means as now provided by law, or to the agreement of consolidation, setting forth the maximum number of shares of stock with nominal or par value and the maximum number of shares without nominal or par value that the corporation is authorized to have outstanding at any time, the classes, with the distinguishing characteristics of each, if any, into which the same are divided, and the nominal or par value of shares of stock other than shares which it is stated are to have no nominal or par value;

Issue bonds and dispose of same in such form, and denomination, and bearing such interest, as the board of directors may determine, and to secure the payment thereof by mortgage of every and all the property and franchises of the consolidated company, and of the companies from which it was formed; and

Do all other acts and things which the companies so consolidating, or either of them, might have done previous to such consolidation.

Acts 1877, ch. 72, § 3; Shan., § 1528; Code 1932, § 2603; Acts 1937, ch. 170, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 2603; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-907.

Compiler's Notes. Section 48-1-501, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 17.05 and Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 18.05.

Section 48-1-505, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 17.05 and Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 18.05.

65-9-108. Privileges and exemption from taxation not transferred.

No franchise, right, power, immunity, or exemption not granted at the time of consolidation by the laws of this state to the railway companies which may form part of such consolidated company shall be given to, transferred to, or conferred upon any such consolidated company, or company or person operating such consolidation of railroads as provided for in this chapter or in any other law of this state; and no exemption from taxation of railroad property and franchises, and capital stock therein, contained in railway charters or other railway laws of this state, shall be transferred to, or conferred upon, such consolidated company, or the property and franchises and capital stock therein, of such consolidation of railroads, or of the property appertaining to and used in the operation of such railroads.

Acts 1877, ch. 72, § 3; Shan., § 1529; Code 1932, § 2604; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-908.

Cross-References. Waiver of tax exemption, § 65-8-108.

65-9-109. Consolidation of proposed roads.

It is lawful for any railroad corporation, existing in this state under a general law, that now has under construction, or proposes to construct and operate and maintain, a railroad for the transportation as common carrier of persons and freights, to consolidate with any other railroad corporation that has under construction, or proposes to construct and operate and maintain, another such railroad for the transportation of persons and freights.

The consolidation provided for in subsection (a) shall not have effect until the terms and conditions of the agreement shall have been approved by a majority of the stockholders of each of the consolidating companies at a regular annual meeting, or at a called meeting called for that purpose.

This section shall not apply to corporations whose proposed railroad line or lines shall run parallel to each other, or in any way compete with each other for the transportation of persons and freights from or to the same points, it being the intention to apply this section, and extend the privileges granted, to such corporations as have, or may have, under construction, or propose to construct, such railroad lines as, when consolidated, will form one (1) continuous line, or one will be but an extension of another or others.

This section shall apply to railroads under construction, or proposed to be constructed, which, when completed, are to be connected, and form one (1) continuous line in this or other states; provided, that the part of the road so consolidated lying in this state shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the state in its legislative and judicial departments to the same extent as if no such consolidation had been made.

Acts 1887, ch. 188, §§ 1-4; Shan., §§ 1532-1535; Code 1932, §§ 2605-2608; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-909 — 65-912.

Cross-References. Consolidation of competing or parallel lines unlawful, § 65-6-131.